District of Columbia statutes.
28-4804.05

Rental property.

To the extent that a trustee accounts for receipts from rental property pursuant to this section, the trustee shall allocate to income an amount received as rent of real or personal property, including an amount received for cancellation or renewal of a lease. An amount received as a refundable deposit, including a security deposit or a deposit that is to be applied as rent for future periods, shall be added to principal and held subject to the terms of the lease and is not available for distribution to a beneficiary until the trustee’s contractual obligations have been satisfied with respect to that amount.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 405 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).